District of Columbia statutes.
19-1307.02

Trustee’s bond.

(a)

A trustee shall give bond to secure performance of the trustee’s duties only if the court finds that a bond is needed to protect the interests of the beneficiaries or is required by the terms of the trust and the court has not dispensed with the requirement.

(b)

The court may specify the amount of a bond, its liabilities, and whether sureties are necessary. The court may modify or terminate a bond at any time.

(c)

A regulated financial-service institution qualified to do trust business in the District of Columbia need not give bond, even if required by the terms of the trust.

History

Mar. 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-104, § 2(b), 51 DCR 208

Section References

This section is referenced in § 19-1301.05.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 702 of the Uniform Trust Code.